Hawaii statutes.
§200-46 Effect of sale. The transfer
of interest by sale hereunder shall be evidenced by a bill of sale from the
appropriate state or county agency, shall be considered a transfer by operation
of law, and shall be governed by provisions applicable thereto. [L 1991, c 272,
pt of §2; am L 2012, c 146, §5]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next